Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2616.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail of protective equipment to a purchaser for nonbusiness use or use of protective equipment by firefighters, volunteer ambulance service personnel or volunteer 12345678910111213141516171819202122 rescue service personnel during the exclusion period. The department shall publish guidance on its publicly accessible Internet website on the implementation of the exclusion under this clause. For the purposes of this clause, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:"Exclusion period" means the six months immediately following the effective date of this clause."Protective equipment" means equipment used by firefighters, volunteer ambulance service personnel or volunteer rescue service personnel to protect their person from injury while performing functions, including helmets, turnout coats and pants, boots, eyeshields, gloves and self-contained respiratory protection units."Purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period, even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2616PN3568 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718